Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 14. Confidentiality and Security of Information

38-13-1401.
Definitions - applicability.

In this part 14, “personal information” means:

Information that identifies or reasonably can be used to identify an individual, such as first and last name in combination with the individual’s:

Social security number or other government-issued number or identifier;

Date of birth;

Home or physical address;

Electronic-mail address or other online contact information or internet provider address;

Financial account number or credit or debit card number;

Biometric data, health or medical data, or insurance information; or

Passwords or other credentials that permit access to an online or other account;

Personally identifiable financial or insurance information, including nonpublic personal information defined by applicable federal law; and

Any combination of data that, if accessed, disclosed, modified, or destroyed without authorization of the owner of the data or is lost or misused, would require notice or reporting under applicable federal and state privacy and data security law, whether or not the administrator or the administrator’s agent is subject to the law.

Provisions of this part 14 applicable to the administrator or the administrator’s records apply to an administrator’s agent.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1402.
Confidential information.

Except as otherwise provided in this article 13, the following are confidential and exempt from public inspection or disclosure:

Records of the administrator and the administrator’s agent related to the administration of this article 13;

Reports and records of a holder in possession of the administrator or the administrator’s agent; and

Personal information and other information derived or otherwise obtained by or communicated to the administrator or the administrator’s agent from an examination under this article 13 of the records of a person.

A record or other information that is confidential under the law of this state other than this article 13, another state, or the United States continues to be confidential when disclosed or delivered under this article 13 to the administrator or administrator’s agent.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 458, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1403.
When confidential information may be disclosed.

When reasonably necessary to enforce or implement this article 13, the administrator may disclose confidential information concerning property held by the administrator or the administrator’s agent only to:

Another department or agency of this state or the United States;

The person that administers the unclaimed property law of another state, if the other state accords substantially reciprocal privileges to the administrator of this state and if the other state is required to maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained in a manner substantially equivalent to the requirements of this part 14; and

A person subject to an examination as required by section 38-13-1004 (1)(f).

Except as otherwise provided in section 38-13-1402 (1), the administrator shall include in published notices and on a website or database required by section 38-13-503 (3) the name of each apparent owner of property held by the administrator. The administrator may include in published notices, printed publications, telecommunications, the internet, or other media and on the website or in the database additional information concerning the apparent owner’s property if the administrator believes the information will assist in identifying and returning property to the owner and does not disclose personal information.

The administrator and the administrator’s agent shall not use confidential information provided to them or in their possession except as expressly authorized by this article 13 or required by law other than this article 13.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 458, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(2) amended,(SB 21-121), ch. 32, p. 133, § 5, effective April 15.

38-13-1404.
Confidentiality agreement.

A person to be examined under section 38-13-1002 may require, as a condition of disclosure of the records of the person to be examined, that each person having access to the records disclosed in the examination execute and deliver to the person to be examined a confidentiality agreement that:

Is in a form that is reasonably satisfactory to the administrator; and

Requires the person having access to records to comply with the provisions of this part 14 applicable to the person.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 459, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1405.
No confidential information in notice.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 38-13-501 and 38-13-502, a holder is not required under this article 13 to include confidential information in a notice the holder is required to provide to an apparent owner under this article 13.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 459, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1406.
Security of information.

If a holder is required to include confidential information in a report to the administrator, the information must be provided by secure means.

If confidential information in a record is provided to and maintained by the administrator or administrator’s agent as required by this article 13, the administrator or administrator’s agent shall:

Implement administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the information as required by the law of this state and federal law whether or not the administrator or the administrator’s agent is subject to the law;

Protect against reasonably anticipated threats or hazards to the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information; and

Protect against unauthorized access to or use of the information that could result in substantial harm or inconvenience to a holder or the holder’s customers, including insureds, annuitants, and policy or contract owners and their beneficiaries.

The administrator:

After notice and comment, shall adopt and implement a security plan that identifies and assesses reasonably foreseeable internal and external risks to confidential information in the administrator’s possession and seeks to mitigate the risks; and

Shall ensure that an administrator’s agent adopts and implements a similar plan with respect to confidential information in the agent’s possession.

The administrator and the administrator’s agent shall educate and train their employees regarding the plan adopted under subsection (3) of this section.

The administrator and the administrator’s agent shall in a secure manner return or destroy all confidential information no longer reasonably needed under this article 13.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 459, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1407.
Security breach.

Except to the extent prohibited by law other than this article 13, the administrator or administrator’s agent shall notify a holder as soon as practicable of:

Suspected loss, misuse, or unauthorized access, disclosure, modification, or destruction of confidential information obtained from the holder in the possession of the administrator or an administrator’s agent; and

Any interference with operations in any system hosting or housing confidential information that:

Compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information; or

Creates a substantial risk of identity fraud or theft.

Except as necessary to inform an insurer, attorney, investigator, or others as required by law, the administrator and an administrator’s agent shall not disclose, without the express consent in a record of the holder, an event described in subsection (1) of this section to a person whose confidential information was supplied by the holder.

If an event described in subsection (1) of this section occurs, the administrator and the administrator’s agent shall:

Take action necessary for the holder to understand and minimize the effects of the event and determine its scope; and

Cooperate with the holder with respect to:

Any notification required by law concerning a data or other security breach; and

A regulatory inquiry, litigation, or similar action.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 460, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1408.
Indemnification for breach.

If a claim is made or action commenced arising out of an event described in section 38-13-1407 (1) relating to confidential information possessed by an administrator’s agent, the administrator’s agent shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless a holder and the holder’s affiliates, officers, directors, employees, and agents as to:

Any claim or action; and

A liability, obligation, loss, damage, cost, fee, penalty, fine, settlement, charge, or other expense, including reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, established by the claim or action.

The administrator shall require an administrator’s agent that will receive confidential information required under this article 13 to maintain adequate insurance for indemnification obligations of the administrator’s agent under subsection (1) of this section. The agent required to maintain the insurance shall provide evidence of the insurance to:

The administrator not less frequently than annually; and

The holder on commencement of an examination and annually thereafter until all confidential information is returned or destroyed under section 38-13-1406 (5).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 460, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.